Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IX.] MEDICAL USE OF MARIJUANA

Note

Medical marijuana; tenant use; eviction, see §521-39.

Law Journals and Reviews

Gonzales v. Raich: How the Medical Marijuana Debate Invoked
Commerce Clause Confusion. 28 UH L. Rev. 261.

Case Notes

District court erred in re-determining the fact of medical
use in contrast to the parties' stipulation that petitioner possessed and
transported medical marijuana under a valid Medical Marijuana Registry Patient
Identification Certificate, thus preempting consideration of petitioner's
affirmative defense; given that the State presented no evidence showing that
the marijuana was for any other use other than a medical use, petitioner proved
that petitioner was authorized to possess marijuana for medical purposes pursuant
to this part for purposes of an affirmative defense under §712-1240.1(2). 129
H. 397, 301 P.3d 607 (2013).

§329-121 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Adequate supply" means an amount of
marijuana jointly possessed between the qualifying patient and the primary
caregiver that is not more than is reasonably necessary to ensure the
uninterrupted availability of marijuana for the purpose of alleviating the
symptoms or effects of a qualifying patient's debilitating medical condition;
provided that an "adequate supply" shall not exceed: seven marijuana
plants, whether immature or mature, and four ounces of usable marijuana at any
given time. The four ounces of usable marijuana shall include any combination
of usable marijuana and manufactured marijuana products, as provided in chapter
329D, with the marijuana in the manufactured marijuana products being
calculated using information provided pursuant to section 329D‑9(c).

"Debilitating medical condition"
means:

(1) Cancer, glaucoma, positive status for human
immunodeficiency virus, acquired immune deficiency syndrome, or the treatment
of these conditions;

(2) A chronic or debilitating disease or medical
condition or its treatment that produces one or more of the following:

(A) Cachexia or wasting syndrome;

(B) Severe pain;

(C) Severe nausea;

(D) Seizures, including those characteristic
of epilepsy;

(E) Severe and persistent muscle spasms,
including those characteristic of multiple sclerosis or Crohn's disease; or

(F) Post-traumatic stress disorder; or

(3) Any other medical condition approved by the
department of health pursuant to administrative rules in response to a request
from a physician or potentially qualifying patient.

"Marijuana" shall have the same
meaning as "marijuana" and "marijuana concentrate" as
provided in sections 329-1 and 712-1240.

"Medical use" means the acquisition,
possession, cultivation, use, distribution, or transportation of marijuana or
paraphernalia relating to the administration of marijuana to alleviate the
symptoms or effects of a qualifying patient's debilitating medical condition.
For the purposes of "medical use", the term distribution is limited
to the transfer of marijuana and paraphernalia.

"Physician" means a person who is
licensed to practice under chapter 453 and is licensed with authority to
prescribe drugs and is registered under section 329-32. "Physician"
does not include physician's assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
with prescriptive authority as described in section 453-5.3 or 457-8.6.

"Primary caregiver" means a person eighteen
years of age or older, other than the qualifying patient and the qualifying
patient's physician, who has agreed to undertake responsibility for managing
the well-being of the qualifying patient with respect to the medical use of
marijuana. In the case of a minor or an adult lacking legal capacity, the
primary caregiver shall be a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody.

"Qualifying patient" means a person
who has been diagnosed by a physician as having a debilitating medical
condition.

"Usable marijuana" means the dried
leaves and flowers of the plant Cannabis family Moraceae, and any mixture or
preparation thereof, that are appropriate for the medical use of marijuana.
"Usable marijuana" does not include the seeds, stalks, and roots of
the plant.

"Written certification" means the
qualifying patient's medical records or a statement signed by a qualifying
patient's physician, stating that in the physician's professional opinion, the
qualifying patient has a debilitating medical condition and the potential
benefits of the medical use of marijuana would likely outweigh the health risks
for the qualifying patient. The department of health may require, through its
rulemaking authority, that all written certifications comply with a designated
form. "Written certifications" are valid for only one year from the
time of signing. [L 2000, c 228, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 11, §43 and c 169, §7;
am L 2010, c 57, §4; am L 2013, c 178, §2; am L 2015, c 241, §6]

Case Notes

Rule of lenity required the construction, under the specific
facts of the case, of §§329-122 and 329-125 and this section against the
government, as there was an irreconcilable inconsistency between the authorized
transportation of medical marijuana under this section, and the prohibition on
transport of medical marijuana through "any ... place open to the
public" under [§329-122(c)(2)(E)]; thus, under §701-115(2)(b), petitioner
was entitled to an acquittal because petitioner's evidence, when considered in
light of any contrary prosecution evidence proved by a preponderance of the
evidence the specified fact or facts with negatived penal liability. 129 H.
397, 301 P.3d 607 (2013).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next